District of Columbia statutes.
8-602

Permit required to maintain privy.

No person shall, in the District of Columbia, erect or maintain a privy, or other means or system for the disposal of human excreta, except by means of waterclosets connected with a sewer and watermain, without having secured from the Director of the Department of Human Services a permit so to do.

Apr. 22, 1940, 54 Stat. 155, ch. 131, § 3
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.
1973 Ed., § 6-702.
1981 Ed., § 6-602.